test/src/morphology/N-tarw35_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tarõ: # Noun (35) tarõ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tarõ+N+Sg+Nom: tarõ
     tarõ+N+Sg+Gen: tarõ
     tarõ+N+Sg+Par: tarrõ
     tarõ+N+Sg+Ill: tarrõ
     tarõ+N+Pl+Gen: tarri
     tarõ+N+Pl+Par: tarri
     tarõ+N+Pl+Ill: [tarrihe, tarri]
     tarõ+N+Pl+All: [tarrilõ, tarilõ]
